Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5001.
Purpose and effect.

In order to safeguard the life and health of the people of this State, a person, other than a professional engineer exempted under this chapter, shall not design a potable water supply or wastewater system that requires a permit or designer’s certification or license under the laws of this State unless currently licensed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5002.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“License” means a current authorization granted by the Director permitting the practice of potable water supply or wastewater system design.

“Potable water supply or wastewater system designer” or “designer” means a person who is licensed under this chapter to engage in the practice of potable water supply or wastewater system design.

“Practice of potable water supply or wastewater system design” or “design” means planning the physical and operational characteristics of a potable water supply or wastewater system that requires a permit or designer’s certification or license under the laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5003.
Prohibitions; offenses.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person, including any corporation, association, or individual, to:

sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any design degree, diploma, certificate of registration, license, or any other related document or record or to aid or abet therein;

practice design under cover of any degree, diploma, registration, license, or related document or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

practice design unless duly registered and currently licensed or otherwise authorized to do so under the provisions of this chapter;

represent himself or herself as being licensed or otherwise authorized by this State to practice design or use in connection with a name any words, letters, signs, or figures that imply that a person is a licensed designer when not licensed or otherwise authorized under this chapter;

practice design during the time a license or authorization issued under this chapter is suspended or revoked;

employ an unlicensed or unauthorized person to practice as a licensed designer; or

practice or employ a licensed designer to practice beyond the scope of his or her practice prescribed by rule.

Any person violating this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5004.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not prohibit:

the furnishing of assistance in the case of an emergency or disaster;

the practice of design by a person employed by the U.S. government or any bureau, division, or agency thereof while in the discharge of his or her official federal duties; or

the practice of any other occupation or profession by a person duly licensed or otherwise authorized under the laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5005.
Qualified professional engineers exempt.

A licensed professional engineer may practice design without a license under this chapter if he or she satisfies the criteria set forth in

10 V.S.A. § 1975(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.